North Carolina, session 2025, HB329.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-551(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) All private church schools and all schools of religious charter are encouraged to do
the following:
…
(5) Tobacco products and hemp-derived consumable products. – Adopt a policy
to prohibit the use of tobacco products and hemp-derived consumable
products on school grounds, using the requirements of Article 29A of this
Chapter as guidance for the policy."
SECTION 2. G.S. 115C-559(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) All qualified nonpublic schools are encouraged to do the following:
…
(5) Tobacco products and hemp-derived consumable products. – Adopt a policy
to prohibit the use of tobacco products and hemp-derived consumable
products on school grounds, using the requirements of Article 29A of this
Chapter as guidance for the policy."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H329-v-2*